Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0740.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 238. (1) When an owner named in a certificate of title
creates a security interest in the vehicle described in the
certificate or in any accessory on the vehicle, all of the
following apply:
(a) The owner shall immediately execute an application in the
form prescribed by the department to name the holder of the
security interest on the certificate of title, showing the name and
SCI S03480'25 (S-1) jyne35


address of the holder and deliver the certificate of title,
application and the required fee together with a copy of the
application, to the holder of the security interest.
(b) The holder of the security interest shall cause the
certificate of title, application and fee and the copy of the
application to be mailed or delivered to the department.
(c) The department shall indicate on the copy of the
application the date and place of filing of the application.
(d) Upon On receipt of the certificate of title, application
and the required fee, the department shall issue a new certificate
in the form provided by section 222 setting forth the name and
address of each holder of a security interest in the vehicle or in
any accessory on the vehicle for which a termination statement has
not been filed and the date on which the application first stating
the security interest was filed, and mail the certificate to the
owner. However, as provided under this section, the secretary of
state is not required to issue a title to the owner of a vehicle if
the title is subject to a security interest.
(2) A holder of any kind of a security interest may assign,
absolutely or otherwise, the holder's security interest in the
vehicle or any accessory thereon on the vehicle to a person other
than the owner without affecting the interest of the owner or the
validity of the security interest, but any person without notice of
the assignment is protected in dealing with the holder of the
security interest as the holder thereof.of the security interest.
(3) If a person rejects the assignment or the purchase of a
motor vehicle lease agreement or installment sale contract, or at
any time after accepting the assignment or purchase of a motor
vehicle lease agreement or installment sale contract, the person
SCI S03480'25 (S-1) jyne35


subsequently reassigns or transfers the motor vehicle lease
agreement or installment sale contract to the licensed dealer or
installment seller after a security interest is identified on the
application for title or the title for the vehicle, the person
shall provide written notice to the licensed dealer or installment
seller that the person does not retain a security interest or that
it has returned the security interest in the vehicle to the
licensed dealer or installment seller. If accompanied by a properly
completed application for title, the department shall accept the
written notice from the person and issue a new title identifying
the licensed dealer or installment seller as the secured party on
the title to the vehicle.
(4) (3) The assignee of a security interest may have the
certificate of title indorsed with the assignee named as the holder
of the security interest by providing the department with a copy of
the assignment instrument, but the failure of the assignee to do so
shall does not affect the validity of the security interest of that
assignment.
(5) (4) If there is no outstanding obligation and no
commitment to make advances, incur obligations, or otherwise give
value secured or to be secured by a security interest in a vehicle
or an accessory on the vehicle, for which the certificate of title
is in possession of a secured party, the secured party may, not
more than 14 days after satisfaction of the obligation, execute a
termination statement in the form prescribed by the department and
mail or deliver the termination statement to the owner or another
person as the owner may direct.
(6) (5) If there is no outstanding obligation and no
commitment to make advances, incur obligations, or otherwise give
SCI S03480'25 (S-1) jyne35


value secured or to be secured by a security interest in a vehicle
or an accessory on the vehicle, for which the certificate of title
is in the possession of another person, the secured party shall,
within 14 days after demand but not more than 30 days after demand,
execute a termination statement in the form prescribed by the
department and mail or deliver the termination statement to the
owner or another person as the owner may direct.
(7) (6) The department may require that all transactions
concerning vehicle title liens and security interests be conducted
by electronic means, as determined by the department. After all
liens have been terminated, or for purposes of retitling the
vehicle in another state or any other purpose deemed appropriate by
the department, the department may issue a paper copy of the
vehicle title to the vehicle's owner.
(8) (7) A vehicle sale transaction in which a security
interest is entered by electronic means shall must include a
document recording entry of the electronic security interest and
information regarding the financial institution that holds the
security interest. At the time a security interest is presented
with payment in satisfaction of the security interest, a secured
receipt in a form approved by the department and produced at the
time the security interest is presented with payment in
satisfaction of the security interest may be submitted to the
department in lieu of the title for purposes of transferring
ownership in the vehicle.
(9) As used in this section, "installment buyer", "installment
sale contract", and "installment seller" mean those terms as
defined in section 2 of the motor vehicle sales finance act, 1950
(Ex Sess) PA 27, MCL 492.102.
SCI S03480'25 (S-1) jyne35


Sec. 806. (1) Until October 1, 2027, an applicant for a
certificate of title required by this act or an applicant for a
duplicate of a certificate of title shall accompany the application
with a fee of $10.00. An applicant that requests that the
application be given special expeditious treatment shall accompany
the application with an additional fee of $5.00. The secretary of
state shall collect a $3.00 service fee, in addition to the other
fees collected under this subsection, for each title issued and
shall deposit the fee in the transportation administration
collection fund created under section 810b through October 1, 2027.
Until October 1, 2027, the $5.00 expeditious treatment fee must be
deposited into the transportation administration collection fund
created under section 810b.
(2) An applicant for a special identifying number under
section 230 shall accompany the application with a fee of $10.00.
(3) In addition to paying the fees required by subsection (1),
until December 31, 2027, each person that applies for a certificate
of title, a salvage vehicle certificate of title, or a scrap
certificate of title under this act shall pay a tire disposal
surcharge of $1.50 for each certificate of title or duplicate of a
certificate of title that person receives. The secretary of state
shall deposit money received under this subsection into the scrap
tire regulatory fund created in section 16908 of the natural
resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL
324.16908.
(4) Beginning January 1, 2027 and subject to this subsection,
a dealer required to submit an application for title for the sale
or lease of a motor vehicle shall submit with each application for
title an additional fee of $3.00. The secretary of state shall
SCI S03480'25 (S-1) jyne35


deposit the additional fee into the motor vehicle sales finance act
fund created in subsection (5). By July 1, 2028 and by July 1 every
2 years after, the director of the department of insurance and
financial services shall adjust the fee under this subsection,
rounded to the nearest whole dollar amount and not to exceed $5.00,
as required under section 6(2) of the motor vehicle sales finance
act, 1950 (Ex Sess) PA 27, MCL 492.106, to the amount necessary to
pay, but not exceed, the department of insurance and financial
services' reasonably anticipated costs for administering the motor
vehicle sales finance act, 1950 (Ex Sess) PA 27, MCL 492.101 to
492.141. The director of the department of insurance and financial
services shall notify the secretary of state of the adjusted fee.
The adjusted fee takes effect January 1 after the adjustment. The
director of the department of insurance and financial services
shall communicate the adjusted fee to the dealers by bulletin when
the department of insurance and financial services sets the
documentary preparation fee under section 13 of the motor vehicle
sales finance act, 1950 (Ex Sess) PA 27, MCL 492.113.
(5) The motor vehicle sales finance act fund is created in the
state treasury.
(6) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets
received from the fees collected under subsection (4) and the motor
vehicle sales finance act, 1950 (Ex Sess) PA 27, MCL 492.101 to
492.141, or from any other source in the fund. The state treasurer
shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit
interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. Money in
the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the fund and
does not lapse to the general fund.
(7) The department of insurance and financial services is the
SCI S03480'25 (S-1) jyne35


administrator of the fund for audits of the fund.
(8) The department of insurance and financial services shall
expend money from the fund, on appropriation, for the
administration of the motor vehicle sales finance act, 1950 (Ex
Sess) PA 27, MCL 492.101 to 492.141, as provided for under section
6(5) of the motor vehicle sales finance act, 1950 (Ex Sess) PA 27,
MCL 492.106.
(9) Beginning March 1, 2027, the fees under this section do
not apply to a new or used vehicle dealer that acquires ownership
of a vehicle that has a title from this state issued electronically
by the secretary of state and that was not owned by a dealer.
(10) Beginning March 1, 2027, for an electronic transfer of
title, if an applicant is a new or used vehicle dealer that
acquires ownership of a vehicle from another new or used vehicle
dealer, the applicant shall pay a fee of $5.00. This fee applies
only if the selling dealer held an electronic title. A new or used
vehicle dealer that pays the fee under this subsection is not
subject to the fees in subsections (1) to (3) or section 810a. The
fee under this subsection must be deposited into the transportation
administration collection fund created under section 810b.
Sec. 810a. The Except as otherwise provided in section 806,
the secretary of state shall collect an assessment of 50 cents in
connection with the issuance of a salvage vehicle certificate of
title, a certificate of title, or beginning July 1, 1994 a scrap
certificate of title. The assessment shall must be collected in the
same manner and at the same time as fees collected by the secretary
of state pursuant to under sections 217c and 806. Each assessment
collected shall must be deposited in a vehicle theft prevention
account to be expended for purposes of developing a vehicle theft
SCI S03480'25 (S-1) jyne35


prevention program, including the administration, inspection, and
enforcement of antitheft procedures, as described in this act.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless Senate Bill No. 739 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into
law.
Final Page
SCI S03480'25 (S-1) jyne35